Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7917.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings and purpose.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The act on climate, chapter 42-6.2 of the general laws, establishes legally binding
greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets for the State of Rhode Island.
(2) The executive climate change coordinating council (EC4), pursuant to the act on
climate, finalized the act on climate strategy report in December 2025, identifying sector-specific
actions necessary to meet those statutory targets.
(3) Failure to integrate the act on climate strategy report into state budgeting and planning
undermines compliance with state law and jeopardizes achievement of mandated emissions
reductions.
(b) It is therefore the purpose of this act to require mandatory, enforceable integration of
the act on climate strategy report into state and quasi-public agency budgeting, capital planning,
and policy development, supported by quantified emissions impact analysis and enforceable review
standards.
SECTION 2. Chapter 42-6.2 of the General Laws entitled "2021 Act on Climate" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-6.2-8.1. Mandatory act on climate compliance in budgeting, planning, and capital
investment.

(a) Applicability. This section shall apply to:
(1) All state administrative departments, agencies, boards, offices, councils, and
commissions; and
(2) All quasi-public agencies, public corporations, and authorities that:
(i) Receive state appropriations;
(ii) Submit capital plans or capital budget requests; or
(iii) Issue debt or bonds subject to state approval or backing.
(b) Mandatory integration into budgets and plans. Beginning with the fiscal year 2027
budget cycle, and for each fiscal year thereafter, each entity subject to this section shall integrate
and implement the applicable recommendations contained in the act on climate strategy report
finalized by the EC4 in December 2025, as amended or updated pursuant to law, in:
(1) Annual operating budget requests;
(2) Capital budget submissions and capital improvement plans;
(3) Strategic plans, performance plans, and policy planning documents; and
(4) Any additional planning or investment documents required by the executive office of
administration or the office of management and budget.
(c) Quantified emissions impact assessment required.
(1) Each submission under subsection (b) of this section shall include a quantified
emissions impact assessment that:
(i) Estimates the anticipated greenhouse gas emissions impact of the proposed budget,
program, or capital project using methodologies approved by the EC4 and the office of energy
resources;
(ii) Identifies whether the proposal:
(A) Reduces greenhouse gas emissions;
(B) Is emissions-neutral; or
(C) Increases greenhouse gas emissions;
(iii) Demonstrates consistency with the emissions reduction targets established under § 42-
6.2-2; and
(iv) Identifies mitigation measures required to offset any projected emissions increases.
(2) Narrative descriptions alone shall not satisfy the requirements of this section.
(d) Act on climate certification — condition of submission. No budget request, capital
project, or planning document subject to this section shall be deemed complete unless it includes
an act on climate compliance certification, signed by the agency head or chief executive officer,
affirming that:
LC005302 - Page 2 of 5

(1) The submission is consistent with the act on climate strategy report;
(2) The quantified emissions impact assessment is accurate to the best of the signer’s
knowledge; and
(3) The submission advances, and does not materially impede, achievement of the state’s
statutory emissions reduction targets.
(e) Enforcement -- budget and capital gatekeeping authority.
(1) The office of management and budget, in consultation with the executive office of
administration and the EC4, shall reject or return any budget or capital submission that fails to
comply with this section.
(2) No capital project subject to this section shall advance to authorization, bonding, or
appropriation without a determination of compliance.
(3) For quasi-public agencies, failure to comply with this section may result in:
(i) Denial or reduction of state appropriations;
(ii) Suspension or denial of bond approval; or
(iii) Deferral of capital project authorization.
(f) Limited exception process. An entity may request a temporary exception from specific
recommendations of the act on climate strategy report only if it:
(1) Demonstrates that compliance is infeasible due to legal, safety, or emergency
conditions;
(2) Identifies alternative actions that achieve equivalent or greater emissions reductions;
and
(3) Receives written approval from the EC4 and the executive office of administration.
Exceptions shall be narrowly construed and time limited.
(g) Public reporting and legislative oversight.
(1) All act on climate compliance certifications and quantified emissions impact
assessments shall be posted on the submitting entity’s public website.
(2) The EC4 shall compile an annual compliance report and submit it to the speaker of the
house, the president of the senate, and the governor no later than July 1 of each year.
(3) The house committee on environment and natural resources and the house committee
on finance may jointly request testimony from any non-compliant entity.
(h) Severability. If any provision of this section or the application thereof is held invalid,
such invalidity shall not affect the remaining provisions.
LC005302 - Page 3 of 5

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005302
========
LC005302 - Page 4 of 5